District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Multiyear Contract No. DHCD-2025-50 with Jubilee Housing, Inc.
Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 451 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 803; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.51), and notwithstanding the
provisions of the Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law
18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-351.01 et seq.), the Reentry Housing and Services Program Act
of 2021, effective November 13, 2021 (D.C. Law 24-45; D.C. Official Code § 42-2231 et seq.),
or any other law, the Council:
(a) Approves Contract No. DHCD-2025-50 between the Department of Housing and
Community Development and Jubilee Housing, Inc., for a 20-year term, in the total not-to-
exceed amount of $33,679,648 (the “agreement”), as a multiyear contract and a contract
involving expenditures in excess of $1 million during a 12-month period; and
(b) Authorizes the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development
to enter into the agreement on behalf of the District.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code §1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2